Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,180
Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund is created. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall remit grants and gifts received by the department for purposes of providing cost share for remediation of superfund sites to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The department shall administer the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund to pay for nonfederal costs, including costs for in-kind services, required as cost share for remediation of superfund sites. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2005, LB 426, § 3;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 80;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 138;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 428.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.